Florida, session 2026, HB991.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
196
197 Section 1. Present subsections (10) through (47) of
198 section 97.021, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
199 subsections (11) through (48), respectively, a new subsection
200 (10) is added to that section, and subsection (6) and present
Page 8 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
201 subsections (43) and (47) of that section are amended, to read:
202 97.021 Definitions.—For the purposes of this code, except
203 where the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term:
204 (6) "Ballot" or "official ballot" means a printed sheet of
205 paper containing contests, including offices and candidates,
206 constitutional amendments, and other public measures, upon which
207 a voter's selections will be marked by using a pen compatible
208 with or recommended for use with the voting system, for
209 tabulation by the voting system. The term includes a voter-
210 verifiable paper output upon which a voter's selections are
211 marked by a voter interface device that meets voter
212 accessibility requirements for individuals with disabilities
213 under s. 301 of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 and s.
214 101.56062 when used in reference to:
215 (a) "Electronic or electromechanical devices" means a
216 ballot that is voted by the process of electronically
217 designating, including by touchscreen, or marking with a marking
218 device for tabulation by automatic tabulating equipment or data
219 processing equipment.
220 (b) "Marksense ballots" means that printed sheet of paper,
221 used in conjunction with an electronic or electromechanical vote
222 tabulation voting system, containing the names of candidates, or
223 a statement of proposed constitutional amendments or other
224 questions or propositions submitted to the electorate at any
225 election, on which sheet of paper an elector casts his or her
Page 9 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
226 vote.
227 (10) "Document acceptable as evidence of United States
228 citizenship" means any of the following documents:
229 (a) An original or certified copy of a United States birth
230 certificate.
231 (b) A valid, unexpired United States passport.
232 (c) A naturalization certificate issued by the United
233 States Department of Homeland Security.
234 (d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad provided by the
235 United States Department of State.
236 (e) A current and valid Florida driver license or Florida
237 identification card issued by the Department of Highway Safety
238 and Motor Vehicles, if such license or identification card
239 indicates United States citizenship.
240 (f) A current and valid photo identification issued by the
241 Federal Government or the state which indicates United States
242 citizenship.
243 (g) An order from a federal court granting United States
244 citizenship.
245
246 If the voter registration applicant's or the voter's legal name
247 is different from the name that appears on the document,
248 official legal documentation providing proof of legal name
249 change is also required to constitute acceptable evidence of
250 United States citizenship.
Page 10 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
251 (44)(43) "Voter interface device" means any device that
252 communicates voting instructions and ballot information to a
253 voter and allows the voter to select and vote for candidates and
254 issues. A voter interface device may not be used to tabulate
255 votes. Any vote tabulation must be based upon a subsequent scan
256 of the marked marksense ballot or the voter-verifiable paper
257 output after the voter interface device process has been
258 completed.
259 (48)(47) "Voting system" means a method of casting and
260 processing votes which that functions wholly or partly by use of
261 electromechanical or electronic apparatus or by use of marksense
262 ballots and includes, but is not limited to, the equipment,
263 hardware, firmware, and software; the ballots; the procedures
264 for casting and processing votes; and the programs, operating
265 manuals, and supplies; and the reports, printouts, and other
266 documentation software necessary for the system's operation.
267 Section 2. Present paragraphs (q) through (u) of
268 subsection (2) of section 97.052, Florida Statutes, are
269 redesignated as paragraphs (r) through (v), respectively, and a
270 new paragraph (q) is added to that subsection, to read:
271 97.052 Uniform statewide voter registration application.—
272 (2) The uniform statewide voter registration application
273 must be designed to elicit the following information from the
274 applicant:
275 (q) Acknowledgment, by providing a box for the applicant
Page 11 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
276 to check, that it is a third degree felony under state and
277 federal law to falsely swear or affirm or otherwise submit false
278 information on a voter registration application.
279 Section 3. Subsection (4) of section 97.0525, Florida
280 Statutes, is amended to read:
281 97.0525 Online voter registration.—
282 (4)(a) The online voter registration system must shall
283 compare the Florida driver license number or Florida
284 identification number submitted pursuant to s. 97.052(2)(n) with
285 information maintained by the Department of Highway Safety and
286 Motor Vehicles to confirm that the name and date of birth on the
287 application are consistent with the records of the Department of
288 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles.
289 (b) If the applicant's name and date of birth are
290 consistent with the records of the Department of Highway Safety
291 and Motor Vehicles and the records of the Department of Highway
292 Safety and Motor Vehicles indicate that the applicant has
293 provided a document acceptable as evidence of United States
294 citizenship, the online voter registration system must shall
295 transmit, using the statewide voter registration system
296 maintained pursuant to s. 98.035, the applicant's registration
297 application, along with the digital signature of the applicant
298 on file with the Department of Highway Safety and Motor
299 Vehicles, to the supervisor of elections. The applicant's
300 digital signature satisfies the signature requirement of s.
Page 12 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
301 97.052(2)(r) s. 97.052(2)(q). The applicant's legal status as a
302 United States citizen must be recorded in the statewide voter
303 registration system.
304 (c) If the applicant's name and date of birth match the
305 records of the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles,
306 but the records of the Department of Highway Safety and Motor
307 Vehicles indicate the applicant is not a United States citizen
308 or has not provided a document acceptable as evidence of United
309 States citizenship, the online voter registration system must
310 notify the supervisor of elections that the applicant's legal
311 status as a United States citizen could not be verified and
312 transmit, using the statewide voter registration system
313 maintained pursuant to s. 98.035, the applicant's registration
314 application, along with the digital signature of the applicant
315 on file with the Department of Highway Safety and Motor
316 Vehicles, to the supervisor of elections. The applicant's
317 digital signature satisfies the signature requirement of s.
318 97.052(2)(r).
319 (d) If the applicant's name and date of birth cannot be
320 verified by the records of the Department of Highway Safety and
321 Motor Vehicles, or if the applicant indicated that he or she has
322 not been issued a Florida driver license or Florida
323 identification card, the online voter registration system must
324 shall populate the applicant's information, except for the
325 applicant's Florida driver license number, Florida
Page 13 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
326 identification card number, or social security number, into a
327 printable voter registration application pursuant to s.
328 97.052(2) which and direct the applicant may to print, complete,
329 sign, and date, the application and deliver the application to
330 the supervisor of elections for disposition pursuant to s.
331 97.073.
332 (e) If the applicant indicates that he or she has not been
333 issued a Florida driver license or identification card, or
334 chooses to use the system to prepopulate an application to
335 print, sign, date, and deliver to the supervisor, the online
336 voter registration system must populate the applicant's
337 information into a printable voter registration application
338 pursuant to s. 97.052(2) and direct the applicant to print,
339 sign, and date the application and deliver the application to
340 the supervisor for disposition under s. 97.073.
341 Section 4. Subsections (2), (4), and (6) of section
342 97.053, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
343 97.053 Acceptance of voter registration applications.—
344 (2) A voter registration application is complete and
345 becomes the official voter registration record of that applicant
346 when all information necessary to establish the applicant's
347 eligibility pursuant to s. 97.041 is received by a voter
348 registration official and verified pursuant to subsection (6).
349 Except as provided in subsection (6), if the applicant fails to
350 complete his or her voter registration application on or before
Page 14 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
351 prior to the date of book closing for an election, then such
352 applicant is shall not be eligible to vote in that election.
353 (4)(a) The registration date for a valid initial voter
354 registration application that has been mailed to a driver
355 license office, a voter registration agency, an armed forces
356 recruitment office, the division, or the office of any
357 supervisor in the state and bears a clear postmark is the date
358 of that postmark. If an initial voter registration application
359 that has been mailed does not bear a postmark or if the postmark
360 is unclear, the registration date is the date the application is
361 received by any supervisor or the division, unless it is
362 received within 5 days after the closing of the books for an
363 election, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, in
364 which case the registration date is the book-closing date.
365 (b) The registration date for a valid application to
366 update a voter's record with a change of address or name is the
367 date the application was initially received once the required
368 sufficient evidence is verified.
369 (c) The registration date for a valid application to
370 update a voter's record with a change of party affiliation is
371 the date the application was initially received, and the
372 registration is effective once the required sufficient evidence
373 is verified unless the registration books are closed for a
374 primary election, in which case the update is effective for the
375 subsequent general election.
Page 15 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
376 (6)(a) A voter registration application, including an
377 application with a change in name, address, or party
378 affiliation, may be accepted as valid only after the department
379 has verified the authenticity or nonexistence of the Florida
380 driver license number, the Florida identification card number,
381 or the last four digits of the social security number provided
382 by the applicant. If a completed voter registration application
383 has been received by the book-closing deadline but the Florida
384 driver license number, the Florida identification card number,
385 or the last four digits of the social security number provided
386 by the applicant cannot be verified, or if the records of the
387 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles indicate that
388 the applicant is not a United States citizen or has not provided
389 a document acceptable as evidence of United States citizenship,
390 the applicant must shall be notified and that the number cannot
391 be verified and that the applicant must provide evidence to the
392 supervisor sufficient to verify the authenticity of the
393 applicant's Florida driver license number, Florida
394 identification card number, or last four digits of the social
395 security number or, if applicable, must provide a document
396 acceptable as evidence of United States citizenship. If the
397 applicant provides the necessary evidence, the supervisor must
398 shall place the applicant's name on the registration rolls as an
399 active voter. If the applicant has not provided the necessary
400 evidence or the number has not otherwise been verified prior to
Page 16 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
401 the applicant presenting himself or herself to vote, the
402 applicant must shall be provided a provisional ballot. The
403 provisional ballot must shall be counted only if the number is
404 verified by the end of the canvassing period or if the applicant
405 presents evidence to the supervisor of elections sufficient to
406 verify the authenticity of the applicant's Florida driver
407 license number, Florida identification card number, or last four
408 digits of the social security number or, if applicable, presents
409 a document acceptable as evidence of United States citizenship
410 no later than 5 p.m. of the second day following the election.
411 (b) Upon receipt of a voter registration application,
412 including an application with a change in name, address, or
413 party affiliation, which indicates that the applicant has not
414 been issued a current and valid Florida driver license, Florida
415 identification card, or social security number, or if the
416 records of the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles
417 indicate that the applicant is not a United States citizen or
418 has not provided a document acceptable as evidence of United
419 States citizenship, the supervisor of elections shall verify the
420 voter's legal status as a United States citizen using available
421 state and federal governmental sources and, if applicable,
422 initiate notice pursuant to s. 98.075(7). If the voter's legal
423 status as a United States citizen is verified, the status must
424 be recorded in the statewide voter registration system. If the
425 applicant provides a document acceptable as evidence of United
Page 17 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
426 States citizenship, the type of document presented must be
427 recorded in the statewide voter registration system.
428 Section 5. Subsections (11) and (13) of section 97.057,
429 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
430 97.057 Voter registration by the Department of Highway
431 Safety and Motor Vehicles.—
432 (11) The Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles
433 shall enter into an agreement with the department to match
434 information in the statewide voter registration system with
435 information in the database of the Department of Highway Safety
436 and Motor Vehicles to the extent required to verify the accuracy
437 of the Florida driver license number, Florida identification
438 number, or last four digits of the social security number and
439 the legal status as a United States citizen, provided on
440 applications for voter registration as required in s. 97.053.
441 The department shall also include in the statewide voter
442 registration system the type of documentary proof that the
443 licensee or cardholder provided as evidence of United States
444 citizenship.
445 (13) Notwithstanding declinations to register or to update
446 a voter registration pursuant to paragraph (2)(b), the
447 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, in accordance
448 with s. 98.093(8), shall must assist the Department of State in
449 regularly identifying changes in residence address on the
450 Florida driver license or Florida identification card or changes
Page 18 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
451 in the Florida driver license or Florida identification card
452 number of such persons who may be voters of a voter. The
453 Department of State must report each such change to the
454 appropriate supervisor of elections who must change the voter's
455 registration records in accordance with s. 98.065(4).
456 Section 6. Effective upon becoming a law, subsection (4)
457 of section 98.015, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
458 98.015 Supervisor of elections; election, tenure of
459 office, compensation, custody of registration-related documents,
460 office hours, successor, seal; appointment of deputy
461 supervisors; duties.—
462 (4)(a) At a minimum, the office of the supervisor must be
463 open Monday through Friday, excluding legal holidays, for a
464 period of not less than 8 hours per day, beginning no later than
465 9 a.m.
466 (b) The office of the supervisor may close to observe
467 legal holidays and other federal, state, or county-approved
468 holidays, if the office is not otherwise required to be open to
469 fulfill official duties under the Florida Election Code.
470 Section 7. Subsection (1) of section 98.045, Florida
471 Statutes, is amended to read:
472 98.045 Administration of voter registration.—
473 (1) ELIGIBILITY OF APPLICANT.—
474 (a) The supervisor shall must ensure that any eligible
475 applicant for voter registration is registered to vote and that
Page 19 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
476 each application for voter registration is processed in
477 accordance with law. The supervisor shall determine whether a
478 voter registration applicant is ineligible based on any of the
479 following:
480 1.(a) The failure to complete a voter registration
481 application as specified in s. 97.053.
482 2.(b) The applicant is deceased.
483 3.(c) The applicant has been convicted of a felony for
484 which his or her voting rights have not been restored.
485 4.(d) The applicant has been adjudicated mentally
486 incapacitated with respect to the right to vote and such right
487 has not been restored.
488 5.(e) The applicant does not meet the age requirement
489 pursuant to s. 97.041.
490 6.(f) The applicant is not a United States citizen.
491 7.(g) The applicant is a fictitious person.
492 8.(h) The applicant has provided an address of legal
493 residence that is not his or her legal residence.
494 9.(i) The applicant has provided a Florida driver license
495 number, Florida identification card number, or the last four
496 digits of a social security number that is not verifiable by the
497 department.
498 (b) If the latest voter registration records show that a
499 new applicant was previously registered but subsequently removed
500 for ineligibility pursuant to s. 98.075(7), the supervisor must
Page 20 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
501 verify the current eligibility of the applicant to register
502 within 13 days after receipt of such records by reviewing the
503 information provided by a governmental entity listed in s.
504 98.075 or s. 98.093 to determine whether the applicant remains
505 ineligible. If the supervisor determines that the applicant is
506 ineligible, the supervisor must deny the application and notify
507 the applicant pursuant to s. 97.073.
508 Section 8. Subsection (6) and paragraph (a) of subsection
509 (7) of section 98.075, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
510 98.075 Registration records maintenance activities;
511 ineligibility determinations.—
512 (6) ELIGIBILITY.—
513 (a) Citizenship.—The department shall identify those
514 registered voters who are potentially ineligible based on their
515 legal status regarding United States citizenship by comparing or
516 receiving information from other governmental entities as
517 authorized by s. 98.093. Upon receipt of information from such
518 other governmental entities indicating a voter may be ineligible
519 based on his or her legal status regarding United States
520 citizenship, the department shall review and make an initial
521 determination as to whether the information is credible and
522 reliable. If the department determines that the information is
523 credible and reliable, the department must notify the supervisor
524 and provide a copy of the supporting documentation indicating
525 potential ineligibility of the voter to be registered. Upon
Page 21 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
526 receipt of the notice that the department has made a
527 determination of initial credibility and reliability, the
528 supervisor must adhere to the procedures set forth in subsection
529 (7) before the removal of a registered voter's name from the
530 statewide voter registration system. If the voter provides a
531 document acceptable as evidence of United States citizenship,
532 the supervisor must record the type of document in the statewide
533 voter registration system.
534 (b) Other bases for ineligibility OTHER BASES FOR
535 INELIGIBILITY.—Subsections (2)-(6) (2)-(5) do not limit or
536 restrict the department or the supervisor in his or her duty to
537 act upon direct receipt of, access to, or knowledge of
538 information from any governmental entity that identifies a
539 registered voter as potentially ineligible. If the department or
540 supervisor receives information from any governmental entity
541 other than those identified in subsections (2)-(6) (2)-(5) that
542 a registered voter is ineligible because the voter is deceased,
543 adjudicated a convicted felon without having had his or her
544 voting rights restored, adjudicated mentally incapacitated
545 without having had his or her voting rights restored, does not
546 meet the age requirement pursuant to s. 97.041, is not a United
547 States citizen, is a fictitious person, or has listed an address
548 that is not his or her address of legal residence, the
549 supervisor must adhere to the procedures set forth in subsection
550 (7) before the removal of the name of a registered voter who is
Page 22 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
551 determined to be ineligible from the statewide voter
552 registration system.
553 (7) PROCEDURES FOR REMOVAL.—
554 (a) If the supervisor receives notice or information
555 pursuant to subsections (4)-(6), the supervisor of the county in
556 which the voter is registered must:
557 1. Notify the registered voter of his or her potential
558 ineligibility by mail within 7 days after receipt of notice or
559 information. The notice must include:
560 a. A statement of the basis for the registered voter's
561 potential ineligibility and a copy of any documentation upon
562 which the potential ineligibility is based. Such documentation
563 must include any conviction from another jurisdiction determined
564 to be a similar offense to murder or a felony sexual offense, as
565 those terms are defined in s. 98.0751.
566 b. A statement that failure to respond within 30 days
567 after receipt of the notice may result in a determination of
568 ineligibility and in removal of the registered voter's name from
569 the statewide voter registration system.
570 c. A return form that requires the registered voter to
571 admit or deny the accuracy of the information underlying the
572 potential ineligibility for purposes of a final determination by
573 the supervisor.
574 d. A statement that, if the voter is denying the accuracy
575 of the information underlying the potential ineligibility, the
Page 23 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
576 voter has a right to request a hearing for the purpose of
577 determining eligibility.
578 e. Instructions for the registered voter to contact the
579 supervisor of elections of the county in which the voter is
580 registered if assistance is needed in resolving the matter.
581 f. Instructions for seeking restoration of civil rights
582 pursuant to s. 8, Art. IV of the State Constitution and
583 information explaining voting rights restoration pursuant to s.
584 4, Art. VI of the State Constitution following a felony
585 conviction, if applicable.
586 g. A list of the documents acceptable as evidence of
587 United States citizenship.
588 h. The following statement: "If you attempt to vote at an
589 early voting site or your normal election day polling place, you
590 will be required to vote a provisional ballot. If you vote by
591 mail, your ballot will be treated as a provisional ballot. In
592 either case, your ballot may not be counted until a final
593 determination of eligibility is made. If you wish for your
594 ballot to be counted, you must contact the supervisor of
595 elections office within 2 days after the election and present
596 evidence that you are eligible to vote."
597 2. If the mailed notice is returned as undeliverable, the
598 supervisor must, within 14 days after receiving the returned
599 notice, either publish notice once in a newspaper of general
600 circulation in the county in which the voter was last registered
Page 24 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
601 or publish notice on the county's website as provided in s.
602 50.0311 or on the supervisor's website, as deemed appropriate by
603 the supervisor. The notice must contain the following:
604 a. The voter's name and address.
605 b. A statement that the voter is potentially ineligible to
606 be registered to vote.
607 c. A statement that failure to respond within 30 days
608 after the notice is published may result in a determination of
609 ineligibility by the supervisor and removal of the registered
610 voter's name from the statewide voter registration system.
611 d. An instruction for the voter to contact the supervisor
612 no later than 30 days after the date of the published notice to
613 receive information regarding the basis for the potential
614 ineligibility and the procedure to resolve the matter.
615 e. An instruction to the voter that, if further assistance
616 is needed, the voter should contact the supervisor of elections
617 of the county in which the voter is registered.
618 f. A statement that, if the voter denies the accuracy of
619 the information underlying the potential ineligibility, the
620 voter has a right to request a hearing for the purpose of
621 determining eligibility.
622 g. The following statement: "If you attempt to vote at an
623 early voting site or your normal election day polling place, you
624 will be required to vote a provisional ballot. If you vote by
625 mail, your ballot will be treated as a provisional ballot. In
Page 25 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
626 either case, your ballot may not be counted until a final
627 determination of eligibility is made. If you wish for your
628 ballot to be counted, you must contact the supervisor of
629 elections office within 2 days after the election and present
630 evidence that you are eligible to vote."
631 3. If a registered voter fails to respond to a notice
632 pursuant to subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2., the supervisor
633 must make a final determination of the voter's eligibility
634 within 7 days after expiration of the voter's timeframe to
635 respond. If the supervisor determines that the voter is
636 ineligible, the supervisor must remove the name of the
637 registered voter from the statewide voter registration system
638 within 7 days. The supervisor shall notify the registered voter
639 of the supervisor's determination and action.
640 4. If a registered voter responds to the notice pursuant
641 to subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. and admits the accuracy of
642 the information underlying the potential ineligibility, the
643 supervisor must, as soon as practicable, make a final
644 determination of ineligibility and remove the voter's name from
645 the statewide voter registration system. The supervisor shall
646 notify the registered voter of the supervisor's determination
647 and action.
648 5. If a registered voter responds to the notice issued
649 pursuant to subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. and denies the
650 accuracy of the information underlying the potential
Page 26 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
651 ineligibility but does not request a hearing, the supervisor
652 must review the evidence and make a determination of eligibility
653 no later than 30 days after receiving the response from the
654 voter. If the supervisor determines that the registered voter is
655 ineligible, the supervisor must remove the voter's name from the
656 statewide voter registration system upon such determination and
657 notify the registered voter of the supervisor's determination
658 and action and that the removed voter has a right to appeal a
659 determination of ineligibility pursuant to s. 98.0755. If such
660 registered voter requests a hearing, the supervisor must send
661 notice to the registered voter to attend a hearing at a time and
662 place specified in the notice. The supervisor shall schedule and
663 issue notice for the hearing within 7 days after receiving the
664 voter's request for a hearing and shall hold the hearing no
665 later than 30 days after issuing the notice of the hearing. A
666 voter may request an extension upon showing good cause by
667 submitting an affidavit to the supervisor as to why he or she is
668 unable to attend the scheduled hearing. Upon hearing all
669 evidence presented at the hearing, the supervisor shall make a
670 determination of eligibility within 7 days. If the supervisor
671 determines that the registered voter is ineligible, the
672 supervisor must remove the voter's name from the statewide voter
673 registration system and notify the registered voter of the
674 supervisor's determination and action and that the removed voter
675 has a right to appeal a determination of ineligibility pursuant
Page 27 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
676 to s. 98.0755.
677 Section 9. Present subsection (9) of section 98.093,
678 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (10), a new
679 subsection (9) is added to that section, and subsection (8) of
680 that section is amended, to read:
681 98.093 Duty of officials to furnish information relating
682 to deceased persons, persons adjudicated mentally incapacitated,
683 persons convicted of a felony, and persons who are not United
684 States citizens.—
685 (8) DEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES.—The
686 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles shall furnish
687 weekly to the department the following information:
688 (a) Information identifying those persons whose names have
689 been removed from the Florida driver license or Florida
690 identification card database during the preceding week because
691 they have been licensed or been issued an identification card in
692 another state. The information must contain the person's name,
693 last known Florida address, date of birth, sex, last four digits
694 of his or her social security number, and Florida driver license
695 number or Florida identification card number and, if available,
696 the address and the state in which the person is now licensed.
697 (b) Information identifying those persons who during the
698 preceding week presented evidence of non-United States
699 citizenship upon being issued a new or renewed Florida driver
700 license or Florida identification card. The information must
Page 28 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
701 contain the person's name; address; date of birth; last four
702 digits of the social security number, if applicable; Florida
703 driver license number or Florida identification card number, as
704 available; and alien registration number or other legal status
705 identifier.
706 (c) Information identifying those persons who during the
707 preceding week presented a document acceptable as evidence of
708 United States citizenship upon being issued a new, renewed, or
709 replacement Florida driver license or Florida identification
710 card. The information must contain the person's name; address;
711 date of birth; last four digits of the social security number,
712 if applicable; Florida driver license number or Florida
713 identification card number, as available; type of documentary
714 proof provided in support of citizenship; and, if applicable,
715 alien registration number or other legal status identifier.
716 (d) Information identifying a change in residence address
717 on the Florida driver license or Florida identification card of
718 any person who declined pursuant to s. 97.057(2) to register or
719 update his or her voter record. The information must contain the
720 person's name; date of birth; last four digits of the social
721 security number, if available; and Florida driver license number
722 or Florida identification card number, as available, in order to
723 identify a voter's registration record. The Department of State
724 must report each such change in residence address to the
725 appropriate supervisor, who must change the voter's registration
Page 29 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
726 records in accordance with s. 98.065(4).
727 (e) Information identifying new, renewed, or replacement
728 Florida driver license or Florida identification card numbers
729 issued to persons who declined pursuant to s. 97.057(2) to
730 register or update their voter record. The information must
731 contain the person's name; date of birth; last four digits of
732 the social security number, if available; and the prior, if
733 applicable, and current Florida driver license number or Florida
734 identification card number in order to identify a voter's
735 registration record. Within 7 days, the Department of State
736 shall report such information to the appropriate supervisor, who
737 must update the voter registration records.
738 (f) Information identifying those persons for which it has
739 received official information during the preceding week that the
740 person is deceased. The information must contain the name,
741 address, date of birth, last four digits of the social security
742 number, Florida driver license number or Florida identification
743 card number, and date of death of each such person.
744 (9) FEDERAL COURTS.—Upon receipt of information from a
745 jury coordinator that a person was disqualified or potentially
746 disqualified as a prospective juror from jury service due to not
747 having United States citizenship, being convicted of a felony,
748 being deceased, being a nonresident of this state, or being a
749 nonresident of the county, the department shall use such
750 information to identify registered voters or applicants for
Page 30 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
751 voter registration who may be potentially ineligible based on
752 information provided in accordance with s. 98.075.
753 Section 10. Effective upon this act becoming a law,
754 paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (1) of section
755 99.021, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraphs (f) and
756 (g) are added to that subsection, to read:
757 99.021 Form of candidate oath.—
758 (1)
759 (b) In addition, any person seeking to qualify for
760 nomination as a candidate of any political party shall, at the
761 time of subscribing to the oath or affirmation, state in
762 writing:
763 1. The party of which the person is a member.
764 2. That the person has been a registered member of the
765 political party for which he or she is seeking nomination as a
766 candidate for at least 365 consecutive days preceding before the
767 beginning of qualifying before preceding the general election
768 for which the person seeks to qualify.
769 3. That the person has paid the assessment levied against
770 him or her, if any, as a candidate for said office by the
771 executive committee of the party of which he or she is a member.
772 4. That the person has not legally changed his or her name
773 through a petition pursuant to s. 68.07 during the 365-day
774 period preceding the beginning of qualifying. This subparagraph
775 does not apply to any change of name in proceedings for
Page 31 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
776 dissolution of marriage or adoption of children or based on a
777 change of name conducted with a marriage certificate.
778 (c) In addition, any person seeking to qualify for office
779 as a candidate with no party affiliation shall, at the time of
780 subscribing to the oath or affirmation, state in writing that he
781 or she is registered without any party affiliation and that he
782 or she has not:
783 1. Been a registered member of any political party for at
784 least 365 consecutive days preceding before the beginning of
785 qualifying before preceding the general election for which the
786 person seeks to qualify.
787 2. Legally changed his or her name through a petition
788 pursuant to s. 68.07 during the 365-day period preceding the
789 beginning of qualifying. This subparagraph does not apply to any
790 change of name in proceedings for dissolution of marriage or
791 adoption of children or based on a change of name conducted with
792 a marriage certificate.
793 (d)1. In addition, each candidate, whether a party
794 candidate, a candidate with no party affiliation, or a write-in
795 candidate, shall, at the time of subscribing to the oath or
796 affirmation, state in writing whether he or she owes any
797 outstanding fines, fees, or penalties that cumulatively exceed
798 $250 for any violations of s. 8, Art. II of the State
799 Constitution; the Code of Ethics for Public Officers and
800 Employees under part III of chapter 112; any local ethics
Page 32 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
801 ordinance governing standards of conduct and disclosure
802 requirements; or chapter 106. If the candidate owes any
803 outstanding fines, fees, or penalties exceeding the threshold
804 amount specified in this paragraph, he or she must also specify
805 the amount owed and each entity that levied such fine, fee, or
806 penalty. For purposes of this paragraph, any such fines, fees,
807 or penalties that have been paid in full at the time of
808 subscribing to the oath or affirmation are not deemed to be
809 outstanding.
810 2. In addition, each candidate seeking federal office,
811 whether a party candidate, a candidate with no party
812 affiliation, or a write-in candidate, shall, at the time of
813 subscribing to the oath or affirmation, state in writing whether
814 he or she intends to trade stocks, if elected, in a manner other
815 than through a trust or similar mechanism which strictly limits
816 his or her ability to influence or exercise control over
817 decisions regarding the management of assets.
818 (f) The statements in subparagraphs (b)4. and (c)2.
819 constitute substantive requirements for the person completing
820 the statement, and compliance with those requirements is
821 mandatory. The sole method to enforce compliance with such
822 requirements is contained in this paragraph. Compliance with
823 subparagraphs (b)4. and (c)2. may be challenged by a qualified
824 candidate or a political party with qualified candidates in the
825 same race by filing an action in the circuit court for the
Page 33 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
826 county in which the qualifying officer is headquartered. A
827 person may not be qualified as a candidate for nomination or
828 election and his or her name may not appear on the ballot if in
829 an order that has become final, the court determines that the
830 person seeking to qualify has legally changed his or her name
831 through a petition pursuant to s. 68.07 during the 365-day
832 period preceding the beginning of qualifying, unless such change
833 of name occurred in proceedings for dissolution of marriage or
834 adoption of children or was based on a change of name conducted
835 with a marriage certificate.
836 (g) The statements in subparagraphs (b)2. and (c)1.
837 constitute substantive requirements for the person completing
838 the statement, and compliance with those requirements is
839 mandatory. The sole method to enforce compliance with such
840 requirements is contained in this paragraph. Compliance with
841 subparagraphs (b)2. and (c)1. may be challenged by a qualified
842 candidate or a political party with qualified candidates in the
843 same race by filing an action in the circuit court for the
844 county in which the qualifying officer is headquartered. A
845 person may not be qualified as a candidate for nomination or
846 election, and his or her name may not appear on the ballot, if,
847 in an order that has become final, the court determines that:
848 1. The person seeking to qualify for nomination as a
849 candidate of any political party has not been a registered
850 member of that party for the 365-day period preceding the
Page 34 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
851 beginning of qualifying; or
852 2. The person seeking to qualify for office as a candidate
853 with no party affiliation has not been registered without party
854 affiliation for, or has been a registered member of any
855 political party during, the 365-day period preceding the
856 beginning of qualifying.
857 Section 11. Effective upon becoming a law, section
858 99.0211, Florida Statutes, is created to read:
859 99.0211 Challenging candidacy.—
860 (1) A candidate must be able to satisfy all statutory and
861 constitutional requirements for the office for which he or she
862 is seeking nomination or election.
863 (2) A candidate or a political party with a candidate in
864 the same race, or an affiliated party committee as authorized by
865 s. 103.092, may challenge a candidate's compliance with
866 subsection (1) by filing an action for declaratory and
867 injunctive relief in the circuit court for the county in which
868 the filing officer is headquartered.
869 (3) A person may not be qualified as a candidate for
870 nomination or election, and his or her name may not appear on
871 the ballot, if, in an order that has become final, the court
872 determines that the candidate will not, at the time of
873 qualification, election, or assumption of office, as applicable,
874 satisfy all statutory and constitutional requirements for the
875 office for which he or she is seeking nomination or election.
Page 35 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
876 (4) A candidate, a political party, or an affiliated party
877 committee bringing an action for declaratory and injunctive
878 relief under subsection (2) is entitled to an expedited final
879 hearing, and any appeal of a final hearing must receive
880 expedited consideration by the appellate court. Upon a final
881 order of the circuit court which contains the determination
882 under subsection (3), the supervisor of elections in each county
883 affected by such candidacy shall remove the name of the
884 candidate from the ballot or, if the ballots have already been
885 printed, include a notice with each vote-by-mail ballot, and
886 post a notice at each early voting location and polling
887 precinct, stating that a vote for such candidate will not be
888 counted.
889 Section 12. Effective upon becoming a law, paragraph (a)
890 of subsection (7) of section 99.061, Florida Statutes, is
891 amended to read:
892 99.061 Method of qualifying for nomination or election to
893 federal, state, county, or district office.—
894 (7)(a) In order for a candidate to be qualified, the
895 following items must be received by the filing officer by the
896 end of the qualifying period:
897 1. A properly executed check drawn upon the candidate's
898 campaign account payable to the person or entity as prescribed
899 by the filing officer in an amount not less than the fee
900 required by s. 99.092, unless the candidate obtained the
Page 36 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
901 required number of signatures on petitions pursuant to s.
902 99.095. The filing fee for a special district candidate is not
903 required to be drawn upon the candidate's campaign account. If a
904 candidate's check is returned by the bank for any reason, the
905 filing officer shall immediately notify the candidate and the
906 candidate shall have until the end of qualifying to pay the fee
907 with a cashier's check purchased from funds of the campaign
908 account. Failure to pay the fee as provided in this subparagraph
909 shall disqualify the candidate.
910 2. The candidate's oath required by s. 99.021, which must
911 contain the name of the candidate as it is to appear on the
912 ballot; the office sought, including the district or group
913 number if applicable; and the signature of the candidate, which
914 must be verified under oath or affirmation pursuant to s.
915 92.525(1)(a).
916 3. If the office sought is partisan, the written statement
917 of political party affiliation required by s. 99.021(1)(b); or
918 if the candidate is running without party affiliation for a
919 partisan office, the written statement required by s.
920 99.021(1)(c).
921 4. If the office sought is federal, the written statement
922 required by s. 99.021(1)(d)2.
923 5. The completed form for the appointment of campaign
924 treasurer and designation of campaign depository, as required by
925 s. 106.021.
Page 37 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
926 6.5. The full and public disclosure or statement of
927 financial interests required by subsection (5). A public officer
928 who has filed the full and public disclosure or statement of
929 financial interests with the Commission on Ethics before
930 qualifying for office may file a copy of that disclosure or a
931 verification or receipt of electronic filing as provided in
932 subsection (5) at the time of qualifying.
933 7. An oath or affirmation in writing that states whether
934 the candidate is a citizen of another country in addition to
935 being a citizen of the United States, and, if so, discloses any
936 other country of which the candidate is also a citizen.
937 8. For a candidate seeking federal office, whether a party
938 candidate, a candidate with no party affiliation, or a write-in
939 candidate, an oath or affirmation in writing which states
940 whether the candidate previously held a federal office and, if
941 so, discloses whether the candidate traded stocks while in such
942 office in a manner other than through a trust or similar
943 mechanism which strictly limited his or her ability to influence
944 or exercise control over decisions regarding the management of
945 assets.
946 Section 13. Subsection (1) of section 101.043, Florida
947 Statutes, is amended to read:
948 101.043 Identification required at polls.—
949 (1)(a) The precinct register, as prescribed in s. 98.461,
950 must shall be used at the polls for the purpose of identifying
Page 38 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
951 the elector at the polls before allowing him or her to vote. The
952 clerk or inspector shall require each elector, upon entering the
953 polling place, to present one of the following current and valid
954 picture identifications:
955 1. Florida driver license.
956 2. Florida identification card issued by the Department of
957 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles.
958 3. United States passport or passport card.
959 4. Debit or credit card.
960 5. United States uniformed services or Merchant Marine
961 Military identification.
962 6. Student identification.
963 7. Retirement center identification.
964 8. Neighborhood association identification.
965 9. Public assistance identification.
966 5.10. Veteran health identification card issued by the
967 United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
968 6.11. A license to carry a concealed weapon or firearm
969 issued pursuant to s. 790.06.
970 7.12. Any other Employee identification card issued by any
971 branch, department, agency, or entity of the Federal Government,
972 the state, a county, or a municipality, excluding identification
973 cards issued by an educational institution.
974 (b) If the picture identification does not contain the
975 signature of the elector, an additional identification that
Page 39 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
976 provides the elector's signature is shall be required. The
977 address appearing on the identification presented by the elector
978 may not be used as the basis to challenge an elector's legal
979 residence. The elector must shall sign his or her name in the
980 space provided on the precinct register or on an electronic
981 device provided for recording the elector's signature. The clerk
982 or inspector shall compare the signature with that on the
983 identification provided by the elector and enter his or her
984 initials in the space provided on the precinct register or on an
985 electronic device provided for that purpose and allow the
986 elector to vote if the clerk or inspector is satisfied as to the
987 identity of the elector.
988 Section 14. Paragraph (d) of subsection (6) of section
989 101.048, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
990 101.048 Provisional ballots.—
991 (6)
992 (d) Instructions must accompany the cure affidavit in
993 substantially the following form:
994
995 READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY BEFORE COMPLETING THE
996 AFFIDAVIT. FAILURE TO FOLLOW THESE INSTRUCTIONS MAY CAUSE YOUR
997 BALLOT NOT TO COUNT.
998 1. In order to cure the missing signature or the signature
999 discrepancy on your Provisional Ballot Voter's Certificate and
1000 Affirmation, your affidavit should be completed and returned as
Page 40 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1001 soon as possible so that it can reach the supervisor of
1002 elections of the county in which your precinct is located no
1003 later than 5 p.m. on the 2nd day after the election.
1004 2. You must sign your name on the line above (Voter's
1005 Signature).
1006 3. You must make a copy of one of the following forms of
1007 identification:
1008 a. Tier 1 identification.—Current and valid identification
1009 that includes your name and photograph: Florida driver license;
1010 Florida identification card issued by the Department of Highway
1011 Safety and Motor Vehicles; United States passport or passport
1012 card; United States uniformed services or Merchant Marine; debit
1013 or credit card; military identification; student identification;
1014 retirement center identification; neighborhood association
1015 identification; public assistance identification; veteran health
1016 identification card issued by the United States Department of
1017 Veterans Affairs; Florida license to carry a concealed weapon or
1018 firearm; or any other employee identification card issued by any
1019 branch, department, agency, or entity of the Federal Government,
1020 the state, a county, or a municipality, excluding identification
1021 cards issued by an educational institution; or
1022 b. Tier 2 identification.—ONLY IF YOU DO NOT HAVE A TIER 1
1023 FORM OF IDENTIFICATION, identification that shows your name and
1024 current residence address: current utility bill; bank statement;
1025 government check; paycheck; or government document (excluding
Page 41 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1026 voter information card).
1027 4. Place the envelope bearing the affidavit into a mailing
1028 envelope addressed to the supervisor. Insert a copy of your
1029 identification in the mailing envelope. Mail (if time permits),
1030 deliver, or have delivered the completed affidavit along with
1031 the copy of your identification to your county supervisor of
1032 elections. Be sure there is sufficient postage if mailed and
1033 that the supervisor's address is correct. Remember, your
1034 information MUST reach your county supervisor of elections no
1035 later than 5 p.m. on the 2nd day following the election or your
1036 ballot will not count.
1037 5. Alternatively, you may fax or e-mail your completed
1038 affidavit and a copy of your identification to the supervisor of
1039 elections. If e-mailing, please provide these documents as
1040 attachments.
1041 6. Submitting a provisional ballot affidavit does not
1042 establish your eligibility to vote in this election or guarantee
1043 that your ballot will be counted. The county canvassing board
1044 determines your eligibility to vote through information provided
1045 on the Provisional Ballot Voter's Certificate and Affirmation,
1046 written evidence provided by you, including information in your
1047 cure affidavit along with any supporting identification, and any
1048 other evidence presented by the supervisor of elections or a
1049 challenger. You may still be required to present additional
1050 written evidence to support your eligibility to vote.
Page 42 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1051 Section 15. Subsection (1) of section 101.151, Florida
1052 Statutes, is amended to read:
1053 101.151 Specifications for ballots.—
1054 (1)(a) Marksense Ballots must shall be printed on paper of
1055 such thickness that the printing cannot be distinguished from
1056 the back and must shall meet the specifications of the voting
1057 system that will be used to tabulate the ballots.
1058 (b) Polling places and early voting sites may employ a
1059 ballot-on-demand production system to print individual marksense
1060 ballots, including provisional ballots, for eligible voters
1061 electors. Ballot-on-demand technology may be used to produce
1062 marksense vote-by-mail, early voting, and election-day ballots.
1063 Section 16. Subsection (4) of section 101.5606, Florida
1064 Statutes, is amended to read:
1065 101.5606 Requirements for approval of systems.—No
1066 electronic or electromechanical voting system shall be approved
1067 by the Department of State unless it is so constructed that:
1068 (4) For systems using marksense ballots, It accepts a
1069 rejected ballot pursuant to subsection (3) if a voter chooses to
1070 cast the ballot, but records no vote for any office that has
1071 been overvoted or undervoted.
1072 Section 17. Section 101.56075, Florida Statutes, is
1073 amended to read:
1074 101.56075 Voting methods.—For the purpose of designating
1075 ballot selections, all voting must be by official marksense
Page 43 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1076 ballot, using a pen compatible with or recommended for use with
1077 the voting system, unless a voter requests to vote using marking
1078 device or a voter interface device that produces a voter-
1079 verifiable paper output and meets the voter accessibility
1080 requirements for individuals with disabilities under s. 301 of
1081 the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 and s. 101.56062.
1082 Section 18. Section 101.5608, Florida Statutes, is amended
1083 to read:
1084 101.5608 Voting at the polls by electronic or
1085 electromechanical method; procedures.—
1086 (1) Each voter elector desiring to vote must shall be
1087 identified to the clerk or inspector of the election as a duly
1088 qualified voter elector of such election and must shall sign his
1089 or her name on the precinct register or other form or device
1090 provided by the supervisor. The inspector shall compare the
1091 signature with the signature on the identification provided by
1092 the voter elector. If the inspector is reasonably sure that the
1093 person is entitled to vote, the inspector must shall provide the
1094 person with a ballot.
1095 (2) When an electronic or electromechanical voting system
1096 utilizes a ballot card or marksense ballot, the following
1097 procedures must shall be followed to vote:
1098 (a) After receiving a ballot from an inspector, the voter
1099 elector shall, without leaving the polling place, retire to a
1100 booth or compartment and mark the ballot. After marking his or
Page 44 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1101 her ballot, the voter must elector shall place the ballot in a
1102 secrecy envelope so that the ballot will be deposited in the
1103 tabulator without exposing the voter's choices.
1104 (b) Any voter who spoils his or her ballot or makes an
1105 error may return the ballot to the election official and secure
1106 another ballot, except that in no case shall a voter be
1107 furnished more than three ballots. If the vote tabulation device
1108 has rejected a ballot, the ballot must shall be considered
1109 spoiled and a new ballot must shall be provided to the voter
1110 unless the voter chooses to cast the rejected ballot. The
1111 election official, without examining the original ballot, shall
1112 state the possible reasons for the rejection and shall provide
1113 instruction to the voter pursuant to s. 101.5611. A spoiled
1114 ballot must shall be preserved, without examination, in an
1115 envelope provided for that purpose. The stub shall be removed
1116 from the ballot and placed in an envelope.
1117 (c) The supervisor of elections shall prepare for each
1118 polling place at least one ballot box to contain the ballots of
1119 a particular precinct, and each ballot box must shall be plainly
1120 marked with the name of the precinct for which it is intended.
1121 (3) The Department of State shall promulgate rules
1122 regarding voting procedures to be used when an electronic or
1123 electromechanical voting system is of a type which does not
1124 utilize a ballot card or marksense ballot.
1125 (4) In any election in which a write-in candidate has
Page 45 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1126 qualified for office, the supervisor of elections shall provide
1127 for write-in voting pursuant to rules adopted by the Division of
1128 Elections.
1129 Section 19. Subsection (5) of section 101.5612, Florida
1130 Statutes, is amended to read:
1131 101.5612 Testing of tabulating equipment.—
1132 (5) Any tests involving marksense ballots pursuant to this
1133 section must shall employ test ballots created by the supervisor
1134 of elections using actual ballots that have been printed for the
1135 election. If ballot-on-demand ballots will be used in the
1136 election, the supervisor must shall also create test ballots
1137 using the ballot-on-demand technology that will be used to
1138 produce ballots in the election, using the same paper stock as
1139 will be used for ballots in the election.
1140 Section 20. Paragraph (d) of subsection (4) of section
1141 101.68, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1142 101.68 Canvassing of vote-by-mail ballot.—
1143 (4)
1144 (d) Instructions must accompany the cure affidavit in
1145 substantially the following form:
1146
1147 READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY BEFORE COMPLETING THE
1148 AFFIDAVIT. FAILURE TO FOLLOW THESE INSTRUCTIONS MAY CAUSE YOUR
1149 BALLOT NOT TO COUNT.
1150
Page 46 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1151 1. In order to ensure that your vote-by-mail ballot will
1152 be counted, your affidavit should be completed and returned as
1153 soon as possible so that it can reach the supervisor of
1154 elections of the county in which your precinct is located no
1155 later than 5 p.m. on the 2nd day after the election.
1156 2. You must sign your name on the line above (Voter's
1157 Signature).
1158 3. You must make a copy of one of the following forms of
1159 identification:
1160 a. Tier 1 identification.—Current and valid identification
1161 that includes your name and photograph: Florida driver license;
1162 Florida identification card issued by the Department of Highway
1163 Safety and Motor Vehicles; United States passport or passport
1164 card; United States uniformed services or Merchant Marine; debit
1165 or credit card; military identification; student identification;
1166 retirement center identification; neighborhood association
1167 identification; public assistance identification; veteran health
1168 identification card issued by the United States Department of
1169 Veterans Affairs; a Florida license to carry a concealed weapon
1170 or firearm; or any an employee identification card issued by any
1171 branch, department, agency, or entity of the Federal Government,
1172 the state, a county, or a municipality, excluding identification
1173 cards issued by an educational institution; or
1174 b. Tier 2 identification.—ONLY IF YOU DO NOT HAVE A TIER 1
1175 FORM OF IDENTIFICATION, identification that shows your name and
Page 47 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1176 current residence address: current utility bill, bank statement,
1177 government check, paycheck, or government document (excluding
1178 voter information card).
1179 4. Place the envelope bearing the affidavit into a mailing
1180 envelope addressed to the supervisor. Insert a copy of your
1181 identification in the mailing envelope. Mail (if time permits),
1182 deliver, or have delivered the completed affidavit along with
1183 the copy of your identification to your county supervisor of
1184 elections. Be sure there is sufficient postage if mailed and
1185 that the supervisor's address is correct. Remember, your
1186 information MUST reach your county supervisor of elections no
1187 later than 5 p.m. on the 2nd day after the election, or your
1188 ballot will not count.
1189 5. Alternatively, you may fax or e-mail your completed
1190 affidavit and a copy of your identification to the supervisor of
1191 elections. If e-mailing, please provide these documents as
1192 attachments.
1193 Section 21. Subsection (2) of section 101.6923, Florida
1194 Statutes, is amended to read:
1195 101.6923 Special vote-by-mail ballot instructions for
1196 certain first-time voters.—
1197 (2) A voter covered by this section must be provided with
1198 printed instructions with his or her vote-by-mail ballot in
1199 substantially the following form:
1200
Page 48 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1201 READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY BEFORE MARKING YOUR
1202 BALLOT. FAILURE TO FOLLOW THESE INSTRUCTIONS MAY CAUSE YOUR
1203 BALLOT NOT TO COUNT.
1204
1205 1. In order to ensure that your vote-by-mail ballot will
1206 be counted, it should be completed and returned as soon as
1207 possible so that it can reach the supervisor of elections of the
1208 county in which your precinct is located no later than 7 p.m. on
1209 the date of the election. However, if you are an overseas voter
1210 casting a ballot in a presidential preference primary or general
1211 election, your vote-by-mail ballot must be postmarked or dated
1212 no later than the date of the election and received by the
1213 supervisor of elections of the county in which you are
1214 registered to vote no later than 10 days after the date of the
1215 election. Note that the later you return your ballot, the less
1216 time you will have to cure signature deficiencies, which is
1217 authorized until 5 p.m. local time on the 2nd day after the
1218 election.
1219 2. Mark your ballot in secret as instructed on the ballot.
1220 You must mark your own ballot unless you are unable to do so
1221 because of blindness, disability, or inability to read or write.
1222 3. Mark only the number of candidates or issue choices for
1223 a race as indicated on the ballot. If you are allowed to "Vote
1224 for One" candidate and you vote for more than one, your vote in
1225 that race will not be counted.
Page 49 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1226 4. Place your marked ballot in the enclosed secrecy
1227 envelope and seal the envelope.
1228 5. Insert the secrecy envelope into the enclosed envelope
1229 bearing the Voter's Certificate. Seal the envelope and
1230 completely fill out the Voter's Certificate on the back of the
1231 envelope.
1232 a. You must sign your name on the line above (Voter's
1233 Signature).
1234 b. If you are an overseas voter, you must include the date
1235 you signed the Voter's Certificate on the line above (Date) or
1236 your ballot may not be counted.
1237 c. A vote-by-mail ballot will be considered illegal and
1238 will not be counted if the signature on the Voter's Certificate
1239 does not match the signature on record. The signature on file at
1240 the start of the canvass of the vote-by-mail ballots is the
1241 signature that will be used to verify your signature on the
1242 Voter's Certificate. If you need to update your signature for
1243 this election, send your signature update on a voter
1244 registration application to your supervisor of elections so that
1245 it is received before your vote-by-mail ballot is received.
1246 6. Unless you meet one of the exemptions in Item 7., you
1247 must make a copy of one of the following forms of
1248 identification:
1249 a. Identification which must include your name and
1250 photograph: United States passport or passport card; United
Page 50 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1251 States uniformed services or Merchant Marine; debit or credit
1252 card; military identification; student identification;
1253 retirement center identification; neighborhood association
1254 identification; public assistance identification; veteran health
1255 identification card issued by the United States Department of
1256 Veterans Affairs; a Florida license to carry a concealed weapon
1257 or firearm; or any an employee identification card issued by any
1258 branch, department, agency, or entity of the Federal Government,
1259 the state, a county, or a municipality, excluding identification
1260 cards issued by an educational institution; or
1261 b. Identification which shows your name and current
1262 residence address: current utility bill, bank statement,
1263 government check, paycheck, or government document (excluding
1264 voter information card).
1265 7. The identification requirements of Item 6. do not apply
1266 if you meet one of the following requirements:
1267 a. You are 65 years of age or older.
1268 b. You have a temporary or permanent physical disability.
1269 c. You are a member of a uniformed service on active duty
1270 who, by reason of such active duty, will be absent from the
1271 county on election day.
1272 d. You are a member of the Merchant Marine who, by reason
1273 of service in the Merchant Marine, will be absent from the
1274 county on election day.
1275 e. You are the spouse or dependent of a member referred to
Page 51 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1276 in paragraph c. or paragraph d. who, by reason of the active
1277 duty or service of the member, will be absent from the county on
1278 election day.
1279 f. You are currently residing outside the United States.
1280 8. Place the envelope bearing the Voter's Certificate into
1281 the mailing envelope addressed to the supervisor. Insert a copy
1282 of your identification in the mailing envelope. DO NOT PUT YOUR
1283 IDENTIFICATION INSIDE THE SECRECY ENVELOPE WITH THE BALLOT OR
1284 INSIDE THE ENVELOPE WHICH BEARS THE VOTER'S CERTIFICATE OR YOUR
1285 BALLOT WILL NOT COUNT.
1286 9. Mail, deliver, or have delivered the completed mailing
1287 envelope. Be sure there is sufficient postage if mailed.
1288 10. FELONY NOTICE. It is a felony under Florida law to
1289 accept any gift, payment, or gratuity in exchange for your vote
1290 for a candidate. It is also a felony under Florida law to vote
1291 in an election using a false identity or false address, or under
1292 any other circumstances making your ballot false or fraudulent.
1293 Section 22. Subsection (2) of section 102.111, Florida
1294 Statutes, is amended to read:
1295 102.111 Elections Canvassing Commission.—
1296 (2) The Elections Canvassing Commission shall meet at 9 8
1297 a.m. on the 9th day after a primary election and at 9 8 a.m. on
1298 the 14th day after a general election to certify the returns of
1299 the election for each federal, state, and multicounty office and
1300 for each constitutional amendment. On days the Legislature
Page 52 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1301 convenes for organizational session pursuant to s. 3(a), Art.
1302 III of the State Constitution, such meeting will begin at 8 a.m.
1303 If a member of a county canvassing board that was constituted
1304 pursuant to s. 102.141 determines, within 5 days after the
1305 certification by the Elections Canvassing Commission, that a
1306 typographical error occurred in the official returns of the
1307 county, the correction of which could result in a change in the
1308 outcome of an election, the county canvassing board must certify
1309 corrected returns to the Department of State within 24 hours,
1310 and the Elections Canvassing Commission must correct and
1311 recertify the election returns as soon as practicable.
1312 Section 23. Subsections (3) through (7) of section
1313 102.141, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1314 102.141 County canvassing board; duties.—
1315 (3) The canvass, except the canvass of returned vote-by-
1316 mail ballots absent electors' returns and the canvass of
1317 provisional ballots, must shall be made from the returns and
1318 certificates of the inspectors as signed and filed by them with
1319 the supervisor, and the county canvassing board may shall not
1320 change the number of votes cast for a candidate, nominee,
1321 constitutional amendment, or other measure submitted to the
1322 electorate of the county, respectively, in any polling place, as
1323 shown by the returns. All returns must shall be made to the
1324 board on or before 2 a.m. of the day following any primary,
1325 general, or other election. If the returns from any precinct are
Page 53 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1326 missing, if there are any omissions on the returns from any
1327 precinct, or if there is an obvious error on any such returns,
1328 the canvassing board must shall order a retabulation of the
1329 returns from such precinct. Before canvassing such returns, the
1330 canvassing board shall examine the tabulation of the ballots
1331 cast in such precinct and determine whether the returns
1332 correctly reflect the votes cast. If there is a discrepancy
1333 between the returns and the tabulation of the ballots cast, the
1334 tabulation of the ballots cast must shall be presumed correct
1335 and such votes must shall be canvassed accordingly.
1336 (4)(a) The supervisor of elections shall upload into the
1337 county's election management system by 7 p.m. local time on the
1338 day before the election the results of all early voting and
1339 vote-by-mail ballots that have been canvassed and tabulated by
1340 the end of the early voting period. Pursuant to ss. 101.5614(8),
1341 101.657, and 101.68(2), the tabulation of votes cast or the
1342 results of such uploads may not be made public before the close
1343 of the polls on election day.
1344 (b) The supervisor of elections, on behalf of the
1345 canvassing board, shall report all early voting and all
1346 tabulated vote-by-mail results to the Department of State within
1347 30 minutes after the polls close. Thereafter, the canvassing
1348 board shall report, with the exception of provisional ballot
1349 results, updated precinct election results shall be uploaded to
1350 the department at least every 45 minutes until all results are
Page 54 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1351 completely reported. The supervisor of elections shall notify
1352 the department immediately of any circumstances that do not
1353 permit periodic updates as required. Results must shall be
1354 submitted in a format prescribed by the department.
1355 (5) The canvassing board shall submit on forms or in
1356 formats provided by the division unofficial returns to the
1357 Department of State for each federal, statewide, state, or
1358 multicounty office or ballot measure no later than noon on the
1359 third day after any primary election and no later than noon on
1360 the fourth day after any general or other election. Such returns
1361 must shall include the canvass of all ballots, including write-
1362 in votes, as required by subsection (2).
1363 (6) If the county canvassing board determines that the
1364 unofficial returns may contain a counting error in which the
1365 vote tabulation system failed to count votes that were properly
1366 marked in accordance with the instructions on the ballot, the
1367 county canvassing board must shall:
1368 (a) Correct the error and retabulate the affected ballots
1369 with the vote tabulation system; or
1370 (b) Request that the Department of State verify the
1371 tabulation software. When the Department of State verifies such
1372 software, the department shall compare the software used to
1373 tabulate the votes with the software filed with the department
1374 pursuant to s. 101.5607 and check the election parameters.
1375 (7) If the unofficial returns reflect that a candidate for
Page 55 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1376 any office was defeated or eliminated by one-half of a percent
1377 or less of the votes cast for such office, that a candidate for
1378 retention to a judicial office was retained or not retained by
1379 one-half of a percent or less of the votes cast on the question
1380 of retention, or that a measure appearing on the ballot was
1381 approved or rejected by one-half of a percent or less of the
1382 votes cast on such measure, a recount shall be ordered of the
1383 votes cast with respect to such office or measure. The Secretary
1384 of State is responsible for ordering recounts in races that are
1385 federal or, state races that are, and multicounty and any other
1386 multicounty races. The county canvassing board or the local
1387 board responsible for certifying the election is responsible for
1388 ordering recounts in all other races. A recount need not be
1389 ordered with respect to the returns for any office, however, if
1390 the candidate or candidates defeated or eliminated from
1391 contention for such office by one-half of a percent or less of
1392 the votes cast for such office request in writing that a recount
1393 not be made.
1394 (a) Each canvassing board responsible for conducting a
1395 recount shall put each marksense ballot through automatic
1396 tabulating equipment and determine whether the returns correctly
1397 reflect the votes cast. If any marksense ballot is physically
1398 damaged so that it cannot be properly counted by the automatic
1399 tabulating equipment during the recount, a true duplicate shall
1400 be made of the damaged ballot pursuant to the procedures in s.
Page 56 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1401 101.5614(4). Immediately before the start of the recount, a test
1402 of the tabulating equipment shall be conducted as provided in s.
1403 101.5612. If the test indicates no error, the recount tabulation
1404 of the ballots cast shall be presumed correct and such votes
1405 shall be canvassed accordingly. If an error is detected, the
1406 cause therefor shall be ascertained and corrected and the
1407 recount repeated, as necessary. The canvassing board shall
1408 immediately report the error, along with the cause of the error
1409 and the corrective measures being taken, to the Department of
1410 State. No later than 11 days after the election, the canvassing
1411 board shall file a separate incident report with the Department
1412 of State, detailing the resolution of the matter and identifying
1413 any measures that will avoid a future recurrence of the error.
1414 If the automatic tabulating equipment used in a recount is not
1415 part of the voting system and the ballots have already been
1416 processed through such equipment, the canvassing board is not
1417 required to put each ballot through any automatic tabulating
1418 equipment again.
1419 (b) Each canvassing board responsible for conducting a
1420 recount where touchscreen ballots were used shall examine the
1421 counters on the precinct tabulators to ensure that the total of
1422 the returns on the precinct tabulators equals the overall
1423 election return. If there is a discrepancy between the overall
1424 election return and the counters of the precinct tabulators, the
1425 counters of the precinct tabulators shall be presumed correct
Page 57 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1426 and such votes shall be canvassed accordingly.
1427 (c) The canvassing board shall submit on forms or in
1428 formats provided by the division a second set of unofficial
1429 returns to the Department of State for each federal, statewide,
1430 state, or multicounty office or ballot measure. The returns
1431 shall be filed no later than 3 p.m. on the 5th day after any
1432 primary election and no later than 3 p.m. on the 9th day after
1433 any general election in which a recount was ordered by the
1434 Secretary of State. If the canvassing board is unable to
1435 complete the recount prescribed in this subsection by the
1436 deadline, the second set of unofficial returns submitted by the
1437 canvassing board shall be identical to the initial unofficial
1438 returns and the submission shall also include a detailed
1439 explanation of why it was unable to timely complete the recount.
1440 However, the canvassing board shall complete the recount
1441 prescribed in this subsection, along with any manual recount
1442 prescribed in s. 102.166, and certify election returns in
1443 accordance with the requirements of this chapter.
1444 (d) The Department of State shall adopt detailed rules
1445 prescribing additional recount procedures for each certified
1446 voting system, which shall be uniform to the extent practicable.
1447 Section 24. Subsection (1) of section 102.166, Florida
1448 Statutes, is amended to read:
1449 102.166 Manual recounts of overvotes and undervotes.—
1450 (1) If the second set of unofficial returns pursuant to s.
Page 58 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1451 102.141 indicates that a candidate for any office was defeated
1452 or eliminated by one-quarter of a percent or less of the votes
1453 cast for such office, that a candidate for retention to a
1454 judicial office was retained or not retained by one-quarter of a
1455 percent or less of the votes cast on the question of retention,
1456 or that a measure appearing on the ballot was approved or
1457 rejected by one-quarter of a percent or less of the votes cast
1458 on such measure, a manual recount of the overvotes and
1459 undervotes cast in the entire geographic jurisdiction of such
1460 office or ballot measure must shall be ordered unless:
1461 (a) The candidate or candidates defeated or eliminated
1462 from contention by one-quarter of 1 percent or fewer of the
1463 votes cast for such office request in writing that a recount not
1464 be made; or
1465 (b) The number of overvotes and undervotes is fewer than
1466 the number of votes needed to change the outcome of the
1467 election.
1468
1469 The Secretary of State is responsible for ordering a manual
1470 recount for federal or, state races that are multicounty, and
1471 any other multicounty races. The county canvassing board or
1472 local board responsible for certifying the election is
1473 responsible for ordering a manual recount for all other races. A
1474 manual recount consists of a recount of marksense ballots or of
1475 digital images of those ballots by a person.
Page 59 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1476 Section 25. Effective July 1, 2026, section 104.042,
1477 Florida Statutes, is created to read:
1478 104.042 Time limitation; election fraud.—A prosecution for
1479 a felony violation under the Florida Election Code must be
1480 commenced within 5 years after the date the violation is
1481 committed.
1482 Section 26. Effective upon becoming a law, paragraph (a)
1483 of subsection (5) of section 105.031, Florida Statutes, is
1484 amended to read:
1485 105.031 Qualification; filing fee; candidate's oath; items
1486 required to be filed.—
1487 (5) ITEMS REQUIRED TO BE FILED.—
1488 (a) In order for a candidate for judicial office or the
1489 office of school board member to be qualified, the following
1490 items must be received by the filing officer by the end of the
1491 qualifying period:
1492 1. Except for candidates for retention to judicial office,
1493 a properly executed check drawn upon the candidate's campaign
1494 account in an amount not less than the fee required by
1495 subsection (3) or, in lieu thereof, the copy of the notice of
1496 obtaining ballot position pursuant to s. 105.035. If a
1497 candidate's check is returned by the bank for any reason, the
1498 filing officer shall immediately notify the candidate and the
1499 candidate shall, the end of qualifying notwithstanding, have 48
1500 hours from the time such notification is received, excluding
Page 60 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1501 Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, to pay the fee with a
1502 cashier's check purchased from funds of the campaign account.
1503 Failure to pay the fee as provided in this subparagraph shall
1504 disqualify the candidate.
1505 2. The candidate's oath required by subsection (4), which
1506 must contain the name of the candidate as it is to appear on the
1507 ballot; the office sought, including the district or group
1508 number if applicable; and the signature of the candidate, duly
1509 acknowledged.
1510 3. The loyalty oath required by s. 876.05, signed by the
1511 candidate and duly acknowledged.
1512 4. The completed form for the appointment of campaign
1513 treasurer and designation of campaign depository, as required by
1514 s. 106.021. In addition, each candidate for judicial office,
1515 including an incumbent judge, shall file a statement with the
1516 qualifying officer, within 10 days after filing the appointment
1517 of campaign treasurer and designation of campaign depository,
1518 stating that the candidate has read and understands the
1519 requirements of the Florida Code of Judicial Conduct. Such
1520 statement shall be in substantially the following form:
1521
1522 Statement of Candidate for Judicial Office
1523
1524 I, ...(name of candidate)..., a judicial candidate, have
1525 received, read, and understand the requirements of the Florida
Page 61 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1526 Code of Judicial Conduct.
1527 ...(Signature of candidate)...
1528 ...(Date)...
1529
1530 5. The full and public disclosure of financial interests
1531 required by s. 8, Art. II of the State Constitution or the
1532 statement of financial interests required by s. 112.3145,
1533 whichever is applicable. A public officer who has filed the full
1534 and public disclosure or statement of financial interests with
1535 the Commission on Ethics or the supervisor of elections prior to
1536 qualifying for office may file a copy of that disclosure at the
1537 time of qualifying.
1538 6. An oath or affirmation in writing that states whether
1539 the candidate is a citizen of another country in addition to
1540 being a citizen of the United States, and, if so, discloses any
1541 other country of which the candidate is also a citizen.
1542 Section 27. Effective upon becoming a law, subsection (3)
1543 is added to section 106.023, Florida Statutes, to read:
1544 106.023 Statement of candidate.—
1545 (3) At the time of filing the statement of candidacy, a
1546 candidate must also provide an oath or affirmation in writing
1547 that states that he or she meets, or will meet at the time of
1548 election for the office sought or at the time of assuming the
1549 office, as applicable, all statutory and constitutional
1550 qualifications for the office sought.
Page 62 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1551 Section 28. Effective July 1, 2026, subsection (12) of
1552 section 106.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1553 106.08 Contributions; limitations on.—
1554 (12)(a)1. For purposes of this subsection, the term
1555 "foreign national" means:
1556 a. A foreign government;
1557 b. A foreign political party;
1558 c. A foreign corporation, partnership, association,
1559 organization, or other combination of persons organized under
1560 the laws of or having its principal place of business in a
1561 foreign country;
1562 d. A person with foreign citizenship; or
1563 e. A person who is not a citizen or national of the United
1564 States and is not lawfully admitted to the United States for
1565 permanent residence.
1566 2. The term does not include:
1567 a. A person who is a dual citizen or dual national of the
1568 United States and a foreign country.
1569 b. A domestic subsidiary of a foreign corporation,
1570 partnership, association, organization, or other combination of
1571 persons organized under the laws of or having its principal
1572 place of business in a foreign country if:
1573 (I) The donations and disbursements used toward a
1574 contribution or an expenditure are derived entirely from funds
1575 generated by the subsidiary's operations in the United States;
Page 63 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1576 and
1577 (II) All decisions concerning donations and disbursements
1578 used toward a contribution or an expenditure are made by
1579 individuals who either hold United States citizenship or are
1580 permanent residents of the United States. For purposes of this
1581 sub-sub-subparagraph, decisions concerning donations and
1582 disbursements do not include decisions regarding the
1583 subsidiary's overall budget for contributions or expenditures in
1584 connection with an election.
1585 (b) A foreign national may not make or offer to make,
1586 directly or indirectly, a contribution or expenditure in
1587 connection with any election held in the state.
1588 (c) A political party, a political committee, an
1589 electioneering communications organization, or a candidate may
1590 not knowingly and willfully accept or solicit, directly or
1591 indirectly, a contribution from a foreign national in connection
1592 with any election held in this state.
1593 Section 29. Section 322.034, Florida Statutes, is created
1594 to read:
1595 322.034 Legal status designation on state-issued driver
1596 licenses and identification cards.—
1597 (1) By July 1, 2027, a Florida driver license or Florida
1598 identification card issued to a qualified applicant who is a
1599 United States citizen as last recorded in the system must
1600 include his or her legal citizenship status at the time of new
Page 64 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1601 issuance, renewal, or replacement.
1602 (2) Notwithstanding any other law, the department must, at
1603 no charge, issue a renewal or replacement driver license or
1604 identification card if a licensee or cardholder timely updates
1605 his or her legal status upon becoming a citizen of the United
1606 States as required in s. 322.19.
1607 Section 30. Effective July 1, 2026, paragraphs (a) and (d)
1608 of subsection (8) of section 895.02, Florida Statutes, are
1609 amended to read:
1610 895.02 Definitions.—As used in ss. 895.01-895.08, the
1611 term:
1612 (8) "Racketeering activity" means to commit, to attempt to
1613 commit, to conspire to commit, or to solicit, coerce, or
1614 intimidate another person to commit:
1615 (a) Any crime that is chargeable by petition, indictment,
1616 or information under the following provisions of the Florida
1617 Statutes:
1618 1. Section 104.155(2), relating to aiding or soliciting a
1619 noncitizen in voting.
1620 2. Section 104.185, s. 104.186, s. 104.187, or s. 104.188,
1621 relating to issue petition activities.
1622 3.2. Section 210.18, relating to evasion of payment of
1623 cigarette taxes.
1624 4.3. Section 316.1935, relating to fleeing or attempting
1625 to elude a law enforcement officer and aggravated fleeing or
Page 65 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1626 eluding.
1627 5.4. Chapter 379, relating to the illegal sale, purchase,
1628 collection, harvest, capture, or possession of wild animal life,
1629 freshwater aquatic life, or marine life, and related crimes.
1630 6.5. Section 403.727(3)(b), relating to environmental
1631 control.
1632 7.6. Section 409.920 or s. 409.9201, relating to Medicaid
1633 fraud.
1634 8.7. Section 414.39, relating to public assistance fraud.
1635 9.8. Section 440.105 or s. 440.106, relating to workers'
1636 compensation.
1637 10.9. Section 443.071(4), relating to creation of a
1638 fictitious employer scheme to commit reemployment assistance
1639 fraud.
1640 11.10. Section 465.0161, relating to distribution of
1641 medicinal drugs without a permit as an Internet pharmacy.
1642 12.11. Section 499.0051, relating to crimes involving
1643 contraband, adulterated, or misbranded drugs.
1644 13.12. Part IV of chapter 501, relating to telemarketing.
1645 14.13. Chapter 517, relating to sale of securities and
1646 investor protection.
1647 15.14. Section 550.235 or s. 550.3551, relating to
1648 dogracing and horseracing.
1649 16.15. Chapter 550, relating to jai alai frontons.
1650 17.16. Section 551.109, relating to slot machine gaming.
Page 66 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1651 18.17. Chapter 552, relating to the manufacture,
1652 distribution, and use of explosives.
1653 19.18. Chapter 560, relating to money transmitters, if the
1654 violation is punishable as a felony.
1655 20.19. Chapter 562, relating to beverage law enforcement.
1656 21.20. Section 624.401, relating to transacting insurance
1657 without a certificate of authority, s. 624.437(4)(c)1., relating
1658 to operating an unauthorized multiple-employer welfare
1659 arrangement, or s. 626.902(1)(b), relating to representing or
1660 aiding an unauthorized insurer.
1661 22.21. Section 655.50, relating to reports of currency
1662 transactions, when such violation is punishable as a felony.
1663 23.22. Chapter 687, relating to interest and usurious
1664 practices.
1665 24.23. Section 721.08, s. 721.09, or s. 721.13, relating
1666 to real estate timeshare plans.
1667 25.24. Section 775.13(5)(b), relating to registration of
1668 persons found to have committed any offense for the purpose of
1669 benefiting, promoting, or furthering the interests of a criminal
1670 gang.
1671 26.25. Section 777.03, relating to commission of crimes by
1672 accessories after the fact.
1673 27.26. Chapter 782, relating to homicide.
1674 28.27. Chapter 784, relating to assault and battery.
1675 29.28. Chapter 787, relating to kidnapping, human
Page 67 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1676 smuggling, or human trafficking.
1677 30.29. Chapter 790, relating to weapons and firearms.
1678 31.30. Chapter 794, relating to sexual battery, but only
1679 if such crime was committed with the intent to benefit, promote,
1680 or further the interests of a criminal gang, or for the purpose
1681 of increasing a criminal gang member's own standing or position
1682 within a criminal gang.
1683 32.31. Former s. 796.03, former s. 796.035, s. 796.04, s.
1684 796.05, or s. 796.07, relating to prostitution.
1685 33.32. Chapter 806, relating to arson and criminal
1686 mischief.
1687 34.33. Chapter 810, relating to burglary and trespass.
1688 35.34. Chapter 812, relating to theft, robbery, and
1689 related crimes.
1690 36.35. Chapter 815, relating to computer-related crimes.
1691 37.36. Chapter 817, relating to fraudulent practices,
1692 false pretenses, fraud generally, credit card crimes, and
1693 patient brokering.
1694 38.37. Chapter 825, relating to abuse, neglect, or
1695 exploitation of an elderly person or disabled adult.
1696 39.38. Section 827.071, relating to commercial sexual
1697 exploitation of children.
1698 40.39. Section 828.122, relating to fighting or baiting
1699 animals.
1700 41.40. Chapter 831, relating to forgery and
Page 68 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1701 counterfeiting.
1702 42.41. Chapter 832, relating to issuance of worthless
1703 checks and drafts.
1704 43.42. Section 836.05, relating to extortion.
1705 44.43. Chapter 837, relating to perjury.
1706 45.44. Chapter 838, relating to bribery and misuse of
1707 public office.
1708 46.45. Chapter 843, relating to obstruction of justice.
1709 47.46. Section 847.011, s. 847.012, s. 847.013, s. 847.06,
1710 or s. 847.07, relating to obscene literature and profanity.
1711 48.47. Chapter 849, relating to gambling, lottery,
1712 gambling or gaming devices, slot machines, or any of the
1713 provisions within that chapter.
1714 49.48. Chapter 874, relating to criminal gangs.
1715 50.49. Chapter 893, relating to drug abuse prevention and
1716 control.
1717 51.50. Chapter 896, relating to offenses related to
1718 financial transactions.
1719 52.51. Sections 914.22 and 914.23, relating to tampering
1720 with or harassing a witness, victim, or informant, and
1721 retaliation against a witness, victim, or informant.
1722 53.52. Sections 918.12, 918.125, and 918.13, relating to
1723 tampering with or harassing court official, retaliating against
1724 court official, and tampering with evidence.
1725 (d) A violation of the Florida Election Code relating to
Page 69 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1726 irregularities or fraud involving issue petition activities.
1727 Section 31. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
1728 made by this act to section 98.075, Florida Statutes, in a
1729 reference thereto, subsection (6) of section 98.065, Florida
1730 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1731 98.065 Registration list maintenance programs.—
1732 (6) The supervisor shall, at a minimum, conduct an annual
1733 review of voter registration records to identify registration
1734 records in which a voter is registered at an address that may
1735 not be an address of legal residence for the voter. For those
1736 registration records with such addresses that the supervisor has
1737 reasonable belief are not legal residential addresses, the
1738 supervisor shall initiate list maintenance activities pursuant
1739 to s. 98.075(6) and (7).
1740 Section 32. For the purpose of incorporating the
1741 amendments made by this act to sections 99.061 and 105.031,
1742 Florida Statutes, in references thereto, paragraph (b) of
1743 subsection (1) of section 99.012, Florida Statutes, is reenacted
1744 to read:
1745 99.012 Restrictions on individuals qualifying for public
1746 office.—
1747 (1) As used in this section:
1748 (b) "Qualify" means to fulfill the requirements set forth
1749 in s. 99.061(7)(a) or s. 105.031(5)(a).
1750 Section 33. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
Page 70 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1751 made by this act to section 98.015, Florida Statutes, in a
1752 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
1753 101.69, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1754 101.69 Voting in person; return of vote-by-mail ballot.—
1755 (2)(a) The supervisor shall allow an elector who has
1756 received a vote-by-mail ballot to physically return a voted
1757 vote-by-mail ballot to the supervisor by placing the return mail
1758 envelope containing his or her marked ballot in a secure ballot
1759 intake station. Secure ballot intake stations shall be placed at
1760 the main office of the supervisor, at each permanent branch
1761 office of the supervisor which meets the criteria set forth in
1762 s. 101.657(1)(a) for branch offices used for early voting and
1763 which is open for at least the minimum number of hours
1764 prescribed by s. 98.015(4), and at each early voting site.
1765 Secure ballot intake stations may also be placed at any other
1766 site that would otherwise qualify as an early voting site under
1767 s. 101.657(1). Secure ballot intake stations must be
1768 geographically located so as to provide all voters in the county
1769 with an equal opportunity to cast a ballot, insofar as is
1770 practicable. Except for secure ballot intake stations at an
1771 office of the supervisor, a secure ballot intake station may
1772 only be used during the county's early voting hours of operation
1773 and must be monitored in person by an employee of the
1774 supervisor's office. A secure ballot intake station at an office
1775 of the supervisor must be continuously monitored in person by an
Page 71 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 991, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
1776 employee of the supervisor's office when the secure ballot
1777 intake station is accessible for deposit of ballots.
1778 Section 34. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
1779 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon
1780 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect January 1,
1781 2027.
Page 72 of 72
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb991 -04-er